Hawaii statutes.
§146-22 Reports. Every person who
slaughters a calf, heifer, cow, steer, or bull, whether wild or domesticated,
at any place other than a duly licensed slaughterhouse shall comply with
section 146-21 and, in addition thereto, shall forthwith report such
slaughtering to the officer in charge of recording brands. Such report shall
include a description of the animal slaughtered, including its sex and a full
description of each and every brand on the animal, the date and place of
slaughter, and the name of the person from whom, and date when, the animal was
acquired. If any of the described brands on the animal appear to be
obliterated, as described in section 142-47, or to be felonious, as described
in section 142-48, the person shall make a report of the obliterated or
felonious brand to the appropriate law enforcement agency pursuant to rules
adopted by the department of agriculture. [L 1953, c 244, §2; RL 1955, §290-2;
HRS §146-22; gen ch 1985; am L 1986, c 163, §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next